California, session 20252026, AB2317.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 130010 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:130010. The department is responsible for reviewing and approving seismic evaluation reports, compliance schedules schedules, and construction documents that are developed by hospital owners, and field review of construction for work done pursuant to this article.